Hawaii statutes.
§431:5-309 Valuation of other securities.
(a) Any security, other than a security covered by section 431:5-308, is
required to be valued at its market value or, if there is no market, at its
value as fixed by an impartial appraiser, all consistent with any current
method for the valuation of any such security formulated or approved by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(b) Preferred or guaranteed stock or shares
while paying full dividends may be carried at a fixed value in lieu of market
value, at the discretion of the commissioner and in accordance with such method
of computation as the commissioner may approve.

(c) The stock of a subsidiary of an insurer
acquired after January 1, 1956, shall be valued on the basis of the value of
only such of the assets of the subsidiary as would constitute lawful
investments for the insurer if acquired or held directly by the insurer. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next